Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1411
Municipality; power to lease.

Any municipality is hereby empowered to enter into a lease, as lessor, with any public body corporate or political subdivision of the State of Nebraska relating to any building or other facility which is the subject of an agreement pursuant to the provisions of section 72-1405.

Laws 1974, LB 945, § 3.